Washington statutes.
RCW 43.136.075

Information from the department of revenue and the employment security department.

Upon request of the citizen commission for performance measurement of tax preferences or the joint legislative audit and review committee, the department of revenue and the department of employment security shall provide information needed by the commission or committee to meet its responsibilities under this chapter.

[ 2006 c 197 s 7.]